Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-776
State Board of Education; policy to
share student data; duties.

The State Board of Education shall enter into memoranda
of understanding on or before September 1, 2010, with the Board of Regents
of the University of Nebraska, the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State
Colleges, and the board of governors of each community college area to adopt
a policy to share student data. At a minimum, the policy shall ensure that
the exchange of information is conducted in conformance with the requirements
of the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, as amended,
20 U.S.C. 1232g, and all federal regulations and applicable guidelines adopted
in accordance with such act, as such act, regulations, and guidelines existed
on January 1, 2010.

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 7.